Florida, session 2026, HB1343.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3) of section 626.7351, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
626.7351 Qualifications for customer representative's
license.—The department shall not grant or issue a license as
customer representative to any individual found by it to be
untrustworthy or incompetent, or who does not meet each of the
following qualifications:
(3) Within 4 years preceding the date that the application
for license was filed with the department, the applicant has
earned the designation of Accredited Advisor in Insurance (AAI),
Associate in General Insurance (AINS), or Accredited Customer
Service Representative (ACSR) from the Insurance Institute of
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1343 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1343 2026 Legislature
America; the designation of Certified Insurance Counselor (CIC)
from the Society of Certified Insurance Service Counselors; the
designation of Certified Professional Service Representative
(CPSR) from the National Foundation for CPSR; the designation of
Certified Insurance Service Representative (CISR) from the
Society of Certified Insurance Service Representatives; the
designation of Certified Insurance Representative (CIR) from
All-Lines Training; the designation of Chartered Customer
Service Representative (CCSR) from American Insurance College;
the designation of Professional Customer Service Representative
(PCSR) from the Professional Career Institute; the designation
of Insurance Customer Service Representative (ICSR) from
Statewide Insurance Associates LLC; the designation of
Registered Customer Service Representative (RCSR) from a
regionally accredited postsecondary institution in the state
whose curriculum is approved by the department and includes
comprehensive analysis of basic property and casualty lines of
insurance and testing which demonstrates mastery of the subject;
a diploma from a Florida high school in which the applicant
completed the insurance and personal finance course provided in
s. 1003.4207; or a degree from an accredited institution of
higher learning approved by the department when the degree
includes a minimum of 9 credit hours of insurance instruction,
including specific instruction in the areas of property,
casualty, and inland marine insurance. The department shall
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1343 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1343 2026 Legislature
adopt rules establishing standards for the approval of
curriculum.
Section 2. Section 1003.4207, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1003.4207 Insurance and personal finance course.—No later
than January 1, 2027, the Department of Education, in
consultation with the Department of Financial Services, shall
develop a 0.5 credit course in insurance and personal finance
which is available to school districts for use beginning with
the 2027-2028 school year. The course must include a
comprehensive analysis of basic property and casualty lines of
insurance consistent with the instructional designations
provided under s. 626.7351(3).
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1343 -01-er